Alabama, session 2026rs, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law, the
Sunset Committee recommends the continuance of the Alabama
Construction Recruitment Institute until October 1, 2028, with
additional recommendation for statutory change as set out in
Section 3.
Section 2. The existence and functioning of the
Alabama Construction Recruitment Institute, created and
functioning pursuant to Sections 41-10-720 to 41-10-732,
inclusive, Code of Alabama 1975, is continued until October 1
2028, and those code sections are expressly preserved.
Section 3. The Alabama Construction Recruitment
Institute, the Alabama Department of Workforce, and other
interested parties shall convene to evaluate and determine
options to enable the institute to utilize the administrative
and operational resources of the department. A report shall be
prepared detailing these findings and submitted to the Chair
Page 1

prepared detailing these findings and submitted to the Chair
SB103 Enrolled
of the Sunset Committee and other members of the Legislature
as deemed appropriate not later than the tenth legislative day
of the 2027 Regular Session, at which point all parties shall
be absolved of their duties and shall cease meeting.
Section 4. The Legislature concurs in the
recommendations of the Sunset Committee as provided in
Sections 1, 2, and 3.
Section 5. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB103 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB103
Senate 05-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 19-Feb-26




By: Senator Kelley
Page 3